Washington statutes.
RCW 18.86.020

Agency relationship—Services agreement.

(1) A broker who performs real estate brokerage services for a buyer is a buyer's agent unless the:

(a) Broker's firm has appointed the broker to represent the seller pursuant to a services agreement between the firm and the seller, in which case the broker is a seller's agent;

(b) Broker's firm has appointed the broker to represent the seller pursuant to a services agreement between the firm and the seller, and the broker's firm has also appointed the broker to represent the buyer pursuant to a services agreement between the firm and the buyer, in which case the appointed broker is a limited dual agent; or

(c) Broker is the seller or one of the sellers.

(2)(a) A firm must enter into a services agreement with the principal before, or as soon as reasonably practical after, its appointed broker commences rendering real estate brokerage services to, or on behalf of, the principal.

(b) The services agreement must include the following:

(i) The term of the agreement, and if the principal is a buyer, a default term of 60 days with the option of a longer term;

(ii) The broker appointed as an agent for the principal;

(iii) Whether the agency relationship is exclusive or nonexclusive, and if the principal is a buyer, checkbox options for the buyer to select either an exclusive or nonexclusive relationship;

(iv) Whether the principal consents to the broker appointed as an agent for the principal to act as a limited dual agent, which consent must be separately initialed by the principal and include an acknowledgment from the principal that a limited dual agent may not advocate terms favorable to one principal to the detriment of the other principal and is further limited as set forth in RCW 18.86.060; and

(v) Whether the principal consents to the firm's designated broker and any managing broker responsible for the supervision of the broker appointed as an agent for the principal to act as a limited dual agent in a transaction in which different brokers affiliated with the same firm represent different parties.

(3) A services agreement is not required when a broker performs real estate brokerage services as a buyer's agent solely for commercial real estate.

(4) A broker may work with a party in separate transactions pursuant to different relationships including, but not limited to, representing a party in one transaction and at the same time not representing that party in a different transaction involving that party, if the broker complies with this chapter in establishing the relationships for each transaction.

[ 2023 c 318 s 2; 2013 c 58 s 2; 1997 c 217 s 1; 1996 c 179 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 318: See note following RCW 18.86.010.

Effective date—1997 c 217 ss 1-6 and 8: "Sections 1 through 6 and 8 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [April 25, 1997]." [ 1997 c 217 s 9.]

Real estate agency pamphlet—1997 c 217 ss 1-6: See note following RCW 18.86.120.